Hawaii statutes.
§188-44 Licenses for mullet. (a) The
department may issue a license to any owner or operator of a fishpond to
lawfully catch the young mullet known as pua during the closed season, for the
purpose of stocking the owner's or operator's pond, and lawfully sell pond
raised mullet during the closed season.

(b) The department may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 necessary for the purpose of this section and to set reasonable
fees. [L 1888, c 58, §§1, 2, 3; am L 1903, c 8, §2; RL 1925, §§763, 764, 765;
am L 1925, c 193, §§1, 2, 3; am imp L 1927, c 264; am L 1933, c 174, §2; RL
1935, §§370, 371; am L 1935, c 85, §1; RL 1945, §1236; RL 1955, §21-77; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §188-44; am L 1981, c 85, §51; gen
ch 1985; am L 1991, c 184, §2; am L 1992, c 163, §1; am L 1999, c 85, §§1, 17;
am L 2002, c 151, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next